tools/hyphenators/hyph_se.dic
UTF-8
LEFTHYPHENMIN 2
RIGHTHYPHENMIN 2
.a1đa1
.a1fi1
.2a1f
.2a1g2
.a2id1
.a2i
.ai1s1
.a2k1
.a2k1k2
.a1l2o
.am1m2a3
.2am
.1a2m1m2
.a1n2a
.a1n1á1
.a2nd1
.a1n2i1
.a1o1
.a1p2o
.1ap
.a1p2r
.a1r2a1
.a1s2i
.as3t2a
.a2st
.a2t2r
.a2t1
.a2t1t2
.á3l2á1
.á2r2á2
.ás3k2a1
.á2sk
.ás3t2a
.á2st
.bá1b
.1b2á
.b2á1ž
.b2bl1
.2b1b
.cas1
.1ca
.ca2t2
.cá3bu
.1c2á
.cá1b
.c2á3m
.cás1
.c2e1m
.1c2e
.co3l2i
.1co
.co1s1
.ča1b
.1ča
.č2a3g
.ča1n
.či2s1
.1či
.čo3l2i
.1č2o
.čo1m
.da1a1
.1d2a
.1d2a3me
.d2am
.1da3n2i
.da2n1
.2da2n3v
.1da2s
.dá2l
.1dá
.dá1n1
.d2á1ž
.1d2i1g
.1di
.di1s1
.d1jo1
.d1n2a1
.dn2
.do3m2i
.1do
.do3s2a
.dy1r1
.1dy
.d1å1
.e1b2e2
.2eb
.ec1
.eid1
.2e2i
.e2k1s1
.e2k
.e2rt1
.2e1r
.2e2u1
.fa3s2e
.1fa
.fá3r2i2
.1fá
.f1ár
.fo2a2
.1fo
.ga1a1
.1ga
.ga3l2e
.3g2al
.ga3s2i
.ga1ž
.gá1j
.1g2á
.3g2e1r1
.1g2e
.g2i3n2a
.1g2i
.g2in1
.2g1s2
.g2s1ž
.1he3d2e
.1h2e
.he1d
.1h2e1r1
.2h2s1
.h1t2a1
.2ht
.hus1
.1h2u
.2i1a2
.i1b1
.id1j
.id1n2
.i1do1
.ii1s1
.i2i
.i1k2o2
.i2l1l1
.i1l2o1
.im1
.i1m2á2
.1i2mp1
.i2n1g1
.2in1
.i2r1d
.is3k2a1
.is1
.i2sk
.i2s2t
.it1á
.i2t2r
.j2a1g1
.1ja
.j2a3l2i
.j2a1m
.jar1
.jád1
.j2á
.j2e1r1
.j2e
.jo2d1
.1jo
.j2s2l1
.2j2s
.1ka1l1
.1k2a
.ka3s2u2
.ká3r2i2
.1k2á
.ká1r
.1k2e1l1
.1k2e
.1ki1l
.1k2i
.k2lp1
.2k1l2
.1ko1d
.1k2o
.1ko1l1
.1k2o1r
.k1r2á1
.2kr
.ku3l2a
.k2u
.1kul
.k1va1
.k2v
.la3b2a
.1l2a
.la1b
.la3s2a
.1la3s2i
.la3s2u2
.1lá1r
.l2á
.lc1
.l1d1i
.2ld
.2l2e2i1
.1l2e
.le3r2a1
.1l2e1r
.lip1
.1l2i
.2l1l2
.lód1
.l1ó
.ma1á2
.1m2a
.ma1l1
.man1
.ma3n2a
.ma3ši2
.m2a2š
.m2á3ši2
.1m2á
.m1á2š
.m2d2g
.2m2d
.me2a
.1me
.1me1d1
.2m2e2i1
.mi3h2u
.1m2i
.2m2k2
.m1m2á2
.2m1m2
.mo1d1
.1mo
.mo3s2a
.m1p2a
.2mp
.m1p2á1
.na3s2i
.1n2a
.n2as
.na2v
.1ná2
.n2á1r
.náv1
.n2e2g1
.1n2e
.2n1g2
.n1g2o2
.2n1m2
.n1m2a1
.2n1n2
.1no3m2
.1n2o
.n1t2a
.2nt
.n2t2ž
.ŋg2
.ob1
.og1
.o2g1s1
.2ok1
.o1me2
.o2n1s2
.op1
.o1r3ie
.2or
.o1r2i
.os1
.o2s2á1
.o1tá1
.o2t1
.oy1á1
.o1y
.p2a3g
.1p2a
.p2a2š
.1p2e2
.pe2d
.p2e1r1
.p2e2t1
.po3l2i1
.1po
.p2ol
.p2st1
.p1s2
.r2a3k2e
.1r2a
.2ra2k
.1r2e1g
.1r2e
.re3p2r
.1r2ep1
.r2e1s
.2rg2
.r1ga1
.r2g1s1
.r2o1á1
.r2o
.1ros1
.ru3b2a
.r2u
.ru2b
.1rus1
.sa1r
.1s2a
.s2a2s
.sá3r2i2
.2s2á
.s2ár
.1si2o1
.1s2i
.s2j2s1
.2sj
.sk2
.s1ki3b
.s1k2i
.sm1ž
.2s1m
.2st2
.1s2u2i2
.1s2u
.1sur1
.ša3lu
.1ša1
.ši3r2a
.1ši2
.š1k2o1
.šo1g
.1šo
.t2a3t1
.1t2a
.ti1b
.1t2i
.til1
.to1n
.1t2o
.to2t1
.t2r2a1
.2t1r
.ttá1
.2t1t2
.tu1d1
.1t2u
.1t2u3m
.1tun2
.t1va1
.2t2v2
.t1v2á2
.ŧ2áf1
.ŧá2
.u1b2á1
.u2b
.2u2e1
.ug1
.ui1d
.2u2i
.u1l2a1
.u1mu1
.2um
.uo1
.ur3t2a
.u2r2t
.u2st1
.u1v2á1
.vá1b
.1v2á
.2vb2
.v2d'1
.2vd
.ve3l2i
.1v2e
.v2el
.v2es2
.vi3h2a
.1v2i
.1vih
.2vk1
.v1m2á1
.2v2m2
.v1r2i2
.2vr
.2vs1
.1x2a2
.xt2
.yd1
.ys1k2
.z2el1
.1z2e
.æs2
.2øi1
.ø2st1
.ø2s
.å1k2
a1a
aa1ga1
a2a1g
aal1
a2a1m
aa2n1
a2ar
1a2as
a2a2t1
aa1v
a1á2
a1á2i1
a1b
a1b2a1d
a1b2a
a1b2a2g
1a1ba2i2
abá1l
a1b2á
2a2b1b
ab1b2á2
1a2bc
a1b2e
a2be1h
a1b2e1l
a2b1m2
ab2o1l
a1b2o
ab2t1
a2b2u2i
a1bu
ab1un2
a2buž
a2b1ž
2ac
acá1r1
a1c2á
ac2e1b
a1c2e
ac1h
a2c1`2
2a2č
a1ç
2ad
2a1d2ad
a1d2a
a2da1o
a2da2t1
a2d1av
a1dá1
ad2á1ž
ad1dá2
a2d1d2
ad1d2e1
ad1du1
a1d2e1m
a1d2e
a1d2en2
a2d2i2i
a1di
a2d2in1
a2d2iv
a2d1j
adj2á1
ad1jo1
ad1m2i1
a2d1m
a2d1n2
ad1n2i1
ad1n2o2
a2d1n2u1
a2d1r2
a2duv
a1du
1a2d1v2
a2d1ž
a1đe2
a1đi2
a2đo
2a2e1
a1e2a
a2eas1
a1e1d
a2e2i
ae2i2n1
ae2k1
ae2k1s2
ae1l2i1
a2el
a2e1m
a2e1r
a2es1
aesk2
a2e2u
a2e1v
a1é
2a1f
a1fa1
af2i1n1
a1fi
a2f2r2
a2f2s2
a2f1ž
af`á1
a2f2`
2a1g
a2g2a2č
a1ga
2a2g2a1g
a2g2a1m
a2ga1n
a2ga1o
aga2r
aga3s2a
aga3s2i
a2gav
aga1ž
a2g2e1b
a1g2e
ag2e2n
a2geš
a2g2e2t1
age3ži2
age1ž
ag1ga2
a2g1g
ag1gu2
agi3e1r
a1g2i
agi2i1
ag2i1n1
a2gis1
a2g2l
ag2n2o
a2g1n
a2g2r2
a3g1r2á1
a2gu2t1
a1gu
a2guv
a1gü
a2g2v
a2gå
2ah
a1hal1
a1h2a
a3h2a1l2a
ahan1
a1har
a1hav
2a1h2á
ah1ča1
a2hč
a1he1d
a1h2e
a2h2e1m
a2h2e2t1
2a2hi
ah1k2a1
a2hk
ah1k2á2
ah1k2i1
2a1h2o
ah1p2a1
a2hp
ah1t2á1
a2ht
a2huv1
a1h2u
a2i
a2i2a2
ai1b2
ai1c
a2id
ai1d2e1
aid1n2
ai2do
ai1e
a2i1g
ai2g1ŋ
ai1g2o1
ai2i2a2
ai2i
a1ii1e
a2i1j
a2i1l2a
aila3s
ai1l2e1
ai1l2i
ai2l2ø1
a2in.
a2in1
a1i2nd
a2i1n2e
ai1n2o
a1ip
ai1r
a2i2s2a1
ais1
a2i2s2i
1ait
2ai2t1b2
2ai2t3d2
ai1t2i1
2ai2t1s2
ai1v2e1
a2iv
ai1v2i1
2a1j
a1ja2
aj2á2
a2j2d2
aj2es3
aj2e
aji1b
ajj2e2
a2j1j
a2k
a1k2a
a1k2a1d
a1k2a1m
ak1á1d
a1k2á
ak1ca2
ak1c
2a1k2e
a1k2e2m
a1k2i
ak1k2á2
a2k1k2
ak1k2i1
a2k2l2
ak1ŋa1
ak1ŋ
a1k2o
a2k1r
ak2r2á
ak1s2a2
a2k1s
ak2s2á1
ak2s2t2
ak1t2o1
a2k1t2
a1k2u1
1ak2v
2a1l2a
a2la1b
al2a1d
a2l2a1g
a1l1a2k
a2l2am
a2la1o
a1l2á
a1l1áh
alá2l
al2á2m
1a1lá1r
alás1
al1b2o1
a2lb
al1c
a2l1č
a2l1d
al3duh
al1du
al3du2t1
a2l2ep1
a1l2e
a1l2e1s
1a2lf1
2a1l2i
a1li1h
a1li2m
alip1
a1lis1
a2l1j
al1k2á1
a2lk
1al1k2u
1a2lm
a2l1o2a
a1l2o
alo1b
a2l1p
a2l1s2
al1t2a1
a2lt
al2t2r
alu2t1
a1lu
2a1ly2
a2l2z
2am
1a2ma.
a1m2a
a2ma1b
a2m2a1g
a3ma2i1
2a2m2am1
ama1n
a1m2á1
a2m1á2i
2a2m1b
am1b2e1
am2b2r2
2a2m2d
2a1me
a2me2a
a1m2e1b
a1me1d
a1m2e1l
2a2m1h
ami1b
a1m2i
ami2i1
ami2i3d
amis2
1a2m2k
aml2á1
am2l2
am2ln1
1a2m1m2
am2n2a
a2m1n2
1am1n2e
2a1m2o
amp2o3l
a2mp
am1po
2a2ms
a2m1t
am2t2a1
a1mus1
a1mu
am1ž
a1mä
a1n2a1d
a1n2a
a1n2a1g
a2n1al
an1ar
a1n2as
ana3s2a
an3a2sk
aná1d
a1ná
a2n1á2j
an2á2r
an1c2e2
a2n1c
1an1ču
an1č
an1d2a1
a2nd
anda3l
a1ne.
a1n2e
a1n2e2l
a2n2en1
a1n2es1
a1neš
a1n2e2t1
an2ga
a2n1g
a1ni.
a1n2i
a2ni2i
a2n1j
an1ja2
an2ju
an1l2a1
a2n3l2
2a2n1n
an1n2á2
an2n2j
a1no2v
a1n2o
a2n1s2
an1s2i1
an2s2k
an3s1t2a2
an2s2t
a2n1š1
an1t2i1
a2nt
1an2t1r
an2u1m
a1n2u
aŋ1ga1
aŋ1k2á2
aŋ1ŋa1
aŋ1ŋ
a1o
ao2a
ao2i1
aois2
ao1l2i
ao1s2i
ao2s1t
ao1t2e1
ao2t1
1ap
a1p2a1
apa1n1
ap1as
ap2e1r2
a1p2e
a2p2l
apm2a3h
a2p1m2
ap1m2a1
ap1m2á1
a1p2o
a2p1o2a
appo3h
a2p1p2
ap1po
a1p2r
ap2r2o1
a1p2sy
ap1s2
apul2
a1p2u
a2p1ž
ap´2á1
a2p´2
2a1q
a1r2a
a3r2a1d
a1ra2l
aran1
a1r2á
ará2d
ar1b2a1
a2rb
ar1ca1
a2r2c
ar1d2a
a2rd
ar3de1d
ar1d2e
a1r2eb
a1r2e
are3l2i
a1r2el
a1r2e2n2
a1r2e1r
ar1ga1
a2rg
a1r2i1a2
a1r2i
a3r1ih
a1ri2o
ari1u2
ar1ja1
a2rj
ar1k2a1
a2rk
1ar3k2i
ar1l2a2
a2r1l
ar2o
a1r1o2a1
aro2n
ar3r2a2
a2r1r
ar1r2i1
ar1s2k
a2r1s2
ar1t2a
a2rt
ar1tá1
a3r2u
a1s2a
as2a1g1
a2s1a2i
a2s1al
a1s2as2
a1s2a3s2a2
a2s2á2
a2s1ád
as2á3l
as2á1n2
as1e2k1
a1s2e
a1s2e1l
as1g2á1
a2s1g2
as3h2a1
a2s1h
as1h2e
as1hi
a1s2i1a2
a1s2i
a1si2l
a2siš
a2s1j
a2sk
2as1k2a1
as1k2i
as3ko2t1
as1k2o
a1sk2u
2a2s1m
as1m2a2
asm1me3
as2m1m2
as2mu
as2n2u
a2s1n2
1as2p2i
as1p
as3ta.
a2st
as1t2a
as3ta1o
as3t1a2r
a3st2a2š
astá2
as3tás
asti3l
as1t2i
a2s2t2u
a1s2u2
a1suv
a2s1ž
as2´s
a2s´
2a2š
a1š2ah
a1ša1
aša1s
a1šá
aš1áh
a1š1e
aš1k2a2
aš1l
a1šoh
a1šo
aššá1
a2š1š2
aš2t2e
a2š1t
aš2t2i2
aš1t2u
a1šu
a2šuh
a1šun1
a2šus2
a2šu2t1
a2t1
a1t2a
ata2r
at2a1s
atá2
a1t1ál
a1t2á1n1
a1t2á1r
at2e3g
a1t2e
at2e1l
at2e1v
a2t3h
at1h2a1
ati1b1
a1t2i
at2i1g
ati2o1
ati2t1
at1n2i2
a2t1n2
a2to2i
a1t2o
ato1s1
a2t1r
ats2k
a2t1s2
attá2
a2t1t2
at1t2e1
a1t2u1
at1v2á1
a2t2v2
at2'2á1
a2t2'
a2t2`
a2u
au2b
1au1d
a2u2e
1auf
au2fá1
1au1g2i
a1u1h2e
au1l
au2l2a
a2u2l2t
au2n2
aup1
au1s2a
a2u1š
au1šu1
1au1t2i1
au2t1
au1t2o1
a1uv
au1va1
av2ah1
a1va
ava2t2
a1v2e
a1v2en2
a1vi2d
a1v2i
2avi1đ
a1vi1h
1a1vi2i
a1vir
a1vi2s1
1a1vit
a1ví
av1l2a1
a2vl
a2v2n
av1va2
a2v1v2
a1vå2
avå2g1
a1w2
a2wa2i2
a2w2a
a1x1
a2x1e
a1y
ay2a
a1y2am1
2az2
a1zi1
a1zo1
a2ža.
a1ž2a
a2ža1b
a2žan1
aža3s2a
a2ž2a2š
a2ža2t1
a2žaž
a1ži2
a1žo
až2žá2
a2ž1ž
a1æ
a1ø
a1å2
aår1
2a2'2
a2'2á
a1'2b
a1'1e
a1's2
2a2´
a´á1r
a´2á1
a2`
a1`2n
á1a
áa2i1d
áa2i
á1á
á1áh
á1á2š
á1b
á1b2a1
á1b2á2
áb3b2a1
á2b1b
áb1b2e1
áb1b2o1
áb3bu1
á1b2e
áb2e1b
á2be1h
á1b2e2l
áb2e2n
á1b2e1s
á2b1m2
áb1m2a1
áb1m2á1
áb1mo2
á1b2o2
áb2o1l
áb2or2
á2b1ž
ác1c2i1
á2c1c2
á2č2á1
á1dá2
ád1d2a2
á2d1d2
ád1d2e2
á1d2e1
á2de2a
á1de1h
á1d2e1n
á2d2e2t1
á1di2
á2d2in1
á2dit
á2d2iv
á2d1j
ádj2á1
ádju2
ád1n2
ád2r2
á1dus1
á1du
á2duv
á1đa1
á1đ2á2
á1đe2
áđi1b
á1đi1
á1đo2
á1e
2áf
á1fa1
áfas2
á1fe
á1fi2
áf1m2á1
áfm2
á1fo2
áf1r2á2
áf2r2
á1g
ága1á2
á1ga
á3g2a2l
ágá2n
á1g2á
ág2á1ž
ág2e2n
á1g2e
ág2e2s2
áge1ž
ági3d
á1g2i
á2g2in1
á2gå
á2h2a2d1
á1h2a
á1h2a1g
á1h2ah
á2h2am
áh1c2e1
á2hc
1á2hč
1áh1k2á1
á2hk
áh1p2i1
á2hp
áh1t2e1
á2ht
á1hus
á1h2u
1á2i
ái1b2m2
ái1b
ái1bu1
á2id
ái1d2e1
ái1d2n2
ái2do
ái3duv
ái1du
ái1g2i1
á2ig
2ái1h
á2i1l2a
á1i2lb
ái1l2i
ái1lu
2áim
á2i1n1
ái1p2a1
1áir
ái1r2o
ái1s1
ái2s2a1
ái2s2á1
á1i2s1g2
ái2s2t
ái3s1tá
ái1tá
ái3va1
á2iv
á1j
á3ja
áj2a2g1
á1j2á
áj2e2
á1ji
áj1il
á3jo2
á1j1ov
á1ju1
á2jå1
á2k1
á1k2a1
ák1či1
ák1č
ák1k2a2
á2k1k2
ákká3h
ák1k2á
1ák1ŋ
á2k1r
1ák2s2á
á2k1s
1ák1s2i
1á2k1š
áktá1
á2k1t2
1ák1t2i
ák1t2o2
á1l2a
á3l2a1h
á3l2á
álá1l
álá2s
1á2lb
ál1di
á2ld
ál3d2in1
á2le.
á1l2e
á1le2k1
á1l2e1m
á1leš
á2l2e2t1
1á2lg
á1li1d
á1l2i
áli2i1
áli2s1
á2li2t1
ál1j
2á2l1l
áll2á2
ál1l2e1
ál1l2i2
ál1l2o1
á2l1o2a
á1l2o
álo1b
álo2n
1á2lt
á1l2u1m
á1lu
á1lu2p1
á1lus
á1luv
ál1v2i2
á2lv
2ám
á1m2a1
ám1a1b
ám2a2g
ám2a1h
ámá2h
á1m2á
ámá2l
ámá2n
á2me.
á1me
á1me2a
á2m2e2t1
á1m2i
ámi1b
ámi2d1
ám2i1t2
ámo2n
á1mo
ámo2t2
ám1p2e1
á2mp
á2mt1
á1mu1
á1mu2b
á2my
ám1ž
á1n2a
á3n2a2č1
á1n1a1l
án1a1o
á2n2á
áná2l
án1d2a1
á2nd
á1n2e1b
á1n2e
á1n2e2g
áne1h1
á1n2e1j
á1ne2k
á1n2el
á1n2e2m
á1n2e2n1
á1n2es1
á1neš
á1ne1ž
án1g2e1
á2n1g
án2gu
á1ni2i1
á1n2i
á2nis1
án1j
á2n2o
án1s2e2
á2n1s2
án1t2o1
á2nt
ánu1h
á1n2u
áŋ2a1h
á1ŋa
á1ŋe
á1ŋi2
á1o
á1ò
2áp1
áp1m2á2
á2p1m2
áp1me1
áp1po1
á2p1p2
á1p2r
á1r2a
ára2b
á2r2a2d
á2ra2l
ár2am1
áran1
á2r1ap
ára3s2a
á1ras
á2r2á
ár1ád
árá1h
á2r1d
ár1di
ár2do
ár1du
á1r2e1g
á1r2e
á1r2es
ár1ga2
á2rg
á1r2i2
1á1r2i1a1
á2r2in1
á2ris2
ár1k2o1
á2rk
ár1l2e1
á2r1l
á1r2o
á1r1o2a
ár3r2e1
á2r1r
ár1re3h
ár1ro3h
árr2o2
á2r1š2
ár1t2a
á2rt
á2r2u1
á1rus2
1á2rv
á2ry
á1s2a
á1s2a1g
á1s1a2l
ás2a2m1
á1s2as2
á1s2až
á2s2e
á1se1h
á1s2e1m2
á1seš
á1se1ž
á2s1h
1á1s2i1a1
á1s2i
á1sie1
á3si1h
á1s2in1
ásis2
ási2t1
á2sk
ás3kan
ás1k2a1
ás1k2i
ás1k2o
ás3kun
ásk2u
ás3kuv
1á2s2l
ás2mu
á2s1m
á1s2o1
1á3so2d
ás1om
áso2n1
á2st
ás3ta.
ás1t2a
ás3t2ah
ás3t1a2r
ástá1
ás2t2u
ás3tu1s
á1s3tuv
ás1uv
á1s2u
1á2š
á1ša1
á2š2am
á1š1e
á1š2e1n1
2á1ši2
áš1k2a1
2á2šm
áš1ša2
á2š1š2
áš1šo1
á2š1t
ášu2b
á1šu
á1šu2t1
2á2t1
á1t2á1r
á2t1h
át1n2e1
á2t1n2
át1n2u1
á2t2o
áto1s1
á2t1r
áttá2
á2t1t2
át1t2i2
á1ŧ
á1u
áva1ž
á1va
ávár1
á1v2á
ávás2
1ávč
áv1d2á2
á2vd
á1v2e
á1v2i2
á1vi1s2
áv2k2u
á2vk
áv1p2á1
á2vp
1á2vs
2á1ž
áža1s
á1ž2a
á2že
á2ži2
á1žo
á1å
á2'1
á'a1
á1´2á1
ã1o2i
ã1ol
ã1on
1b2a
ba2a
1ba1b
1b2a2b2a
1b2ac
1b2ad
ba2d2e
b2a2e1
1b2a1g
ba3ga
ba2g1h1
1b2a1h
1ba2i2
ba2id1
1b2a1j
1ba2k
1bal
b2a1l2i1
1b2a1m
1ban
b1a2nd
ba1n2i1
ba2n2u
1bar
1bas
ba2s2e
2ba2s1r2
1b2a2š
1ba2t1
1bav
1baž
ba1ž2a
1b2á
bá1d2a
bá1di2
bá1du
bá1g2o
bá1g
báh1
bá1j2e2
bá1j
bá2ji
bá2n2u
b1á2r2á
bá2r2e
bá2r2i2
b1á2r1l
bá1s2a
bá1s2i
bás3k2i
bá2sk
bá1z
bázo1
bá1ž2a
b2á1ž
2b1b
b3b2a
b1ba2s
bbá1g
b1b2á
bbá2n
bbá2s
b1b2es2
b1b2e
bb1l2e2
b2bl
b2b1o2a
b1b2o
bbo2s2
b2b2r2
b3bu1
bbu2g
b1bu2l
bbu1s2
b1by1
2bc
b1cp
bc1ž
2b2d1
b2d2m
b2d1r2
b2d1ž
1b2e
1be.
2be2ah
be2a
1b1e2a2i
be1a2k1
1b2eal
b2e1b
1bec
2be1ču
b2eč
1be1d
be1di
b2e1g
be2g2i
1be1h2a
be1h
be3has1
1be1hi
1b2e2i
be2k1
be1k2i1
1b2el
be3l2a2č
be1l2a
be3l2až
be1l2e1
be3l2eb
be3li2i
be1l2i
bel1l2o3
be2l1l
be2m2a
b2e1m
be2mo
1b2e1o
b2e1p1
1b2e1r
be2r2g
1b2es
be3si2i
be1s2i
1beš
1b2e2t1
be2t1h1
1b2e1v
b1f
b2f2d2
b2f2s2
2b1g
bg2en1
b1g2e
2bh2
b1h2a
b2hal1
b1h2u1
bh1´2a
b2h´
1b2i
bib1m2
bi1b
bid1
bi2e
bi2id1
bi2i
bi1l2i
bi2me
bi1n2e
b2in1
bi2n1g2
bin1j
2bi2n3l2
bi1oh
bi2o
bi1r2o
bi2s2e
bis1
b2i2s2i
bi2s2t
bi1tá
bi`á1
bi2`
b1í
b2j
2bk
b1k2i1
b2kj
2bl
b1l2a
b2l2a2š1
b2l1d
b1l2e
b3le.
b2l2e2i2
b2l2g
b1l2i
b1l2o1
b2l1u1
b2l1y2
b2l1æ
bm2
b1m2a1
bma1b
bm2a2h
b2man
bmá2b
b1m2á
b2m1b2
b1me
bm2e2m
bm2e2n
b1m2e1s2
bmil2
b1m2i
bm2i3l2a
bmi1s2
b1mo2
b2mo2a
bmos2
b2m1ov
bm2u2i1
b1mu
bm2u2m
2b2n2
b2n1p1
b2n1š1
1b2o
bo2ga1
bo2g2i
b2o2k
bo2k2l2
b2ol
bo3l2a2č
bo1l2a
bo3l2a2š1
bo3l2až
b2om
bo2m2a
bo3n2e2t1
bo1n2e
bo2n1j
bo2r2g
b2or
b1o1r2i
bo1r2u1
bos1
bo3s2as
bo1s2a
b2o2s2e
b2ou1
box2
bozos3
bo1zo
2b1p
b1p2i1
bp2n
b1po1
1bq1
2b1r2
2b1r2a
b1r2a1d
b1ra2l
bra2t2
bri2i1
b1r2i
b2r2j
1b2r2o
b2rp1
b2r2å1
2bs2
1b2s2á1
b1s2e
b1s2i
b1s2k
b2s1t2
b1s2t2i
b1s2u
b1š
b2t
btá1
b2t2b2
b1t2e
bt2nj
b2t1n2
b2t2ž
bt1`1e
b2t`
bt1`2g
1bu
bu2d
1buđ
bu1g2o
1buh
1buk
1bul
bu2l1m
b2u1m
bu2m2a
bu2m2i
bu2mo2
1buo
bu2r2t
bu1s
1bu1s2i
1busk
1bu2s2v
1buv
2b1v2
b1w
2b1x
1by
by1h
by2n
by1n2a1
b1y1o
b1z
2bž
b1ž2a
b2ä
1bø
bør1
bø1t
1bö
bå2
2b2'
b1'2n
2b´
2b2`
b2`2a
b`ár1
b1`2b
b1`1d
b1`2n
1ca
c2a1g2
ca2g2i
c2a1h
ca3hal1
ca1h2a
ca2id1
ca2i
ca1l
c2a1l2a2
c2a2m
c2a2m2o
ca2n
ca1n2a
c1a2n1s2
ca2n1v
ca2s2a
ca2s2e
ca2s2i
ca2s2t
c1a2t3h
ca2t1
